dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="z/iehen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehen</l>   <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehend</l>  <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieh</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieht</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehe</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehst</l>   <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieht</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehen</l>   <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ieht</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>iehen</l>   <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>og</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogst</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>og</l>      <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogen</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogt</l>     <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ogen</l>    <r>iehen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abw/eichen__vblex">
      <e>       <p>   <l>eichen</l>  <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eichend</l> <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eiche</l>   <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eichst</l>  <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eicht</l>   <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eichen</l>  <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eicht</l>   <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>eichen</l>  <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ich</l>     <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ichst</l>   <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ich</l>     <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ichen</l>   <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>icht</l>    <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ichen</l>   <r>eichen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="allzusehr__preadv">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="was__prn">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Interjektionen -->

    <pardef n="hallo__ij">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Abkürzungen -->

    <pardef n="Abk.__abbr">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="allzu"><i>allzu</i><par n="allzusehr__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="deshalb"><i>deshalb</i><par n="allzusehr__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="deswegen"><i>deswegen</i><par n="allzusehr__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="allzusehr__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="wie"><i>wie</i><par n="allzusehr__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="irgendetwas"><i>irgendetwas</i><par n="was__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="irgendwas"><i>irgendwas</i><par n="was__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="jedermann"><i>jedermann</i><par n="was__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="was"><i>was</i><par n="was__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="wenige"><i>wenige</i><par n="was__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="abziehen"><i>abz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anziehen"><i>anz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aufziehen"><i>aufz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ausziehen"><i>ausz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="davonziehen"><i>davonz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="einziehen"><i>einz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fortziehen"><i>fortz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="herausziehen"><i>herausz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umziehen"><i>umz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vorziehen"><i>vorz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wegziehen"><i>wegz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ziehen"><i>z</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zurückziehen"><i>zurückz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zuziehen"><i>zuz</i><par n="z/iehen__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ah"><i>ah</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="äh"><i>äh</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aha"><i>aha</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ähm"><i>ähm</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="au"><i>au</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aua"><i>aua</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="autsch"><i>autsch</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bitte"><i>bitte</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bum"><i>bum</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="danke"><i>danke</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="Donnerwetter"><i>Donnerwetter</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ha"><i>ha</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hallo"><i>hallo</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="he"><i>he</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hm"><i>hm</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hoppla"><i>hoppla</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hurra"><i>hurra</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="los"><i>los</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="naja"><i>naja</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="oh"><i>oh</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="OK"><i>OK</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="okay"><i>okay</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="pfui"><i>pfui</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="prost"><i>prost</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="pst"><i>pst</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="puh"><i>puh</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="schade"><i>schade</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tja"><i>tja</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tschüs"><i>tschüs</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tschüss"><i>tschüss</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="Wau"><i>Wau</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="wau-wau"><i>wau-wau</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="alles Gute zum Geburtstag"><i>alles<b/>Gute<b/>zum<b/>Geburtstag</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="auf Wiedersehen"><i>auf<b/>Wiedersehen</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="beeilt euch"><i>beeilt<b/>euch</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="besser spät als nie"><i>besser<b/>spät<b/>als<b/>nie</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bitte schön"><i>bitte<b/>schön</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="es tut mir leid"><i>es<b/>tut<b/>mir<b/>leid</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="guten Morgen"><i>guten<b/>Morgen</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="in Ordnung"><i>in<b/>Ordnung</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="mein Herr"><i>mein<b/>Herr</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="meine Damen und Herren"><i>meine<b/>Damen<b/>und<b/>Herren</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nicht wahr"><i>nicht<b/>wahr</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="vielen Dank"><i>vielen<b/>Dank</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="wie geht es Ihnen"><i>wie<b/>geht<b/>es<b/>Ihnen</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="zum Geburtstag viel Glück"><i>zum<b/>Geburtstag<b/>viel<b/>Glück</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="zum Wohl"><i>zum<b/>Wohl</i><par n="hallo__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="Abk."><i>Abk.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Apr."><i>Apr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="B.B.C."><i>B.B.C.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="BBC"><i>BBC</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="bes."><i>bes.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Bsp."><i>Bsp.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="bzgl."><i>bzgl.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="bzw."><i>bzw.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ca."><i>ca.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Chr."><i>Chr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Co."><i>Co.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="d.h."><i>d.h.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="DaF"><i>DaF</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="DDR"><i>DDR</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Dr."><i>Dr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="eigtl."><i>eigtl.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="entspr."><i>entspr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="exkl."><i>exkl.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="f."><i>f.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="F.C."><i>F.C.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Fam."><i>Fam.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Fr."><i>Fr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Frl."><i>Frl.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="geb."><i>geb.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="gegr."><i>gegr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Ges."><i>Ges.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="gest."><i>gest.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Hr."><i>Hr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Hrsg."><i>Hrsg.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="i.b."><i>i.b.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="i.J."><i>i.J.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="K.o."><i>K.o.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Kap."><i>Kap.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Ko."><i>Ko.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Lat."><i>Lat.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="m.E."><i>m.E.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="m.W."><i>m.W.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="männl."><i>männl.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="MfG"><i>MfG</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Mio."><i>Mio.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="MTA"><i>MTA</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="MwSt."><i>MwSt.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="n.Chr."><i>n.Chr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Nov."><i>Nov.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Nr."><i>Nr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="NW"><i>NW</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="NY"><i>NY</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="od."><i>od.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="P.S."><i>P.S.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Pfd."><i>Pfd.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="Prof."><i>Prof.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="PS"><i>PS</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="QE2"><i>QE2</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="S."><i>S.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="s.u."><i>s.u.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="u."><i>u.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="u.a."><i>u.a.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="UKW"><i>UKW</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="usw."><i>usw.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="v.Chr."><i>v.Chr.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="z.B."><i>z.B.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="z.T."><i>z.T.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="z.Z."><i>z.Z.</i><par n="Abk.__abbr"/></e>
